Utah statutes.
34A-2-1005.   Enforcement.

(1)  The commission may investigate a business entity to determine whether the business entity validly elects to not cover an owner, partner, or corporate officer or director as an employee under a workers' compensation policy in accordance with Section 34A-2-103.

(2)  If the commission determines that a business entity's election as provided in this section is invalid, the commission may:

(a)  prohibit a business entity from using a waiver obtained under this part; and

(b)  take any action provided for under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, for failure to obtain workers' compensation coverage for an employee.



Enacted by Chapter 328, 2011 General Session

